California, session 20252026, AB2671.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1505 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:1505. The director, with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of Transportation, shall organize the department in a manner that he or she the director may deem necessary to conduct the work of the department.